Arkansas, session 2025, HB1252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 17, is amended to add an additional
chapter to read as follows:
CHAPTER 108

CERTIFIED COMMUNITY-BASED DOULA CERTIFICATION ACT

Subchapter 1 - General Provisions

17-108-101. Title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Certified
Community-Based Doula Certification Act”.

17-108-102. Definitions.
*JMB036*
04-03-2025 17:22:37 JMB036

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 S4/3/25 HB1252
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Certified community-based doula" means an individual who is
a trained professional and provides nonclinical emotional, physical, and
informational support to women, before and during pregnancy and continuing
through the postpartum period; and
(2) “Health benefit plan” means an individual, blanket, or group
plan, policy, or contract for healthcare services issued or delivered in this
state by a healthcare insurer, health maintenance organization, hospital
medical service corporation, or self-insured governmental or church plan in
this state.
Subchapter 2 - Certification

17-108-201. Certified community-based doula — Certification.
(a) The Department of Health shall issue a certification to be a
certified community-based doula to an individual who:
(1) Is eighteen (18) years of age or older;
(2) Submits evidence of:
(A) Maintaining a certification from a doula certification
organization designated by the department under § 17-108-203; or
(B) Holding a certificate as a doula by the Doula Alliance
of Arkansas; and
(3) Submits an application with an application fee of fifty
dollars ($50.00).
(b)(1) A certification under this section is valid for two (2) years
after the date of issuance.
(2) To renew a certification, a doula shall:
(A)(i) Complete ten (10) hours of professional development
requirements and training over two (2) years.
(ii) The department, in conjunction with the Doula
Alliance of Arkansas, may adopt rules relating to the tracking by the
department of professional development and training; and
(B) Submit a renewal application with a renewal
application fee as determined by the department.
(c) The department shall create and maintain a registry of certified
community-based doulas to be made available to the public.

04-03-2025 17:22:37 JMB036

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 S4/3/25 HB1252
17-108-202. Suspension, revocation, nonissuance, or nonrenewal.
(a) The Department of Health may suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue
or renew the certification of a certified community-based doula for:
(1) Securing a certification under this chapter through fraud or
deceit;
(2) Unethical conduct, gross ignorance, or inefficiency in the
conduct of his or her practice;
(3) Using a false name or an alias in his or her practice;
(4) Violating any provision of this chapter; or
(5) Failing to comply with any of the requirements for issuance
of the certification.
(b) Proceedings under this section shall comply with the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

17-108-203. Designated doula certification organizations.
(a) The Department of Health, in conjunction with the Doula Alliance
of Arkansas, shall establish criteria for an organization to be designated as
a doula certification organization.
(b)(1) The department, in conjunction with the Doula Alliance of
Arkansas, shall periodically review the doula certification organizations
designated by the department.
(2) The department, in conjunction with the Doula Alliance of
Arkansas, may:
(A) Designate additional organizations as doula
certification organizations for the purpose of certifying doulas for
inclusion on the registry of certified community-based doulas; and
(B)(i) Remove the designation of a doula certification
organization previously designated.
(ii) If the department removes a designation, the
department shall provide notice of the removal by publication on the
department's website and specify the date after which a certification by the
doula certification organization no longer authorizes a doula certified by
the doula certification organization to be included on the certified
community-based doula registry.
(c)(1) A doula certification organization seeking designation under
this section shall provide the department with evidence that the doula
04-03-2025 17:22:37 JMB036

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 S4/3/25 HB1252
certification organization satisfies designation criteria established by the
department.
(2) If the department designates a doula certification
organization under this section, the department shall provide notice of the
designation by publication on the department's website for the certified
community-based doula registry and specify the date after which a
certification by the doula certification organization authorizes a doula
certified by the organization to be included on the certified community-based
doula registry.
(d) This section does not prohibit an individual from submitting his
or her doula certification to the department without involvement of a doula
certification organization.

Subchapter 3 - Miscellaneous Provisions

17-108-301. Scope of practice.
A certified community-based doula under this chapter shall perform only
the following types of services:
(1) Providing childbirth education;
(2) Helping pregnant women navigate the healthcare system;
(3) Advocating for pregnant women before, during, and after the
birth of a child;
(4) Connecting pregnant women with community resources; and
(5) Supporting pregnant women with continuous emotional and
physical support throughout labor and birth and intermittently during the
prenatal and postpartum periods.

17-108-302. Patient and personal data and information.
(a) Patient and personal data and information accessed or attained by
a certified community-based doula under this chapter is exempt from
disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.,
and is confidential and privileged as otherwise required by federal law.
(b) If a certified community-based doula under this chapter does not
maintain the confidential and privileged nature of the patient data or
information, the doula shall be subject to any penalty under state and
federal law for a breach of confidential patient data or information.
04-03-2025 17:22:37 JMB036

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 S4/3/25 HB1252

17-108-303. Certified community-based doula compensation.
(a) A certified community-based doula under this chapter shall receive
compensation for services provided from:
(1) The Arkansas Medicaid Program; and
(2) A health benefit plan.
(b) Services described in subsection (a) of this section shall include
support during a hospital delivery and during the prenatal and postpartum
periods as defined through rules established by the Department of Human
Services.
17-108-304. Rules.
(a) The Department of Health may promulgate rules relating to the
certification and regulation of certified community-based doulas under this
subchapter and relating to the designation of an organization as a doula
certification organization.
(b) On or before December 31, 2025, the Department of Human Services
shall promulgate rules relating to the reimbursement of doulas under the
Arkansas Medicaid Program.

/s/L. Johnson
















04-03-2025 17:22:37 JMB036